Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AUDITS OF MINNESOTA HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the state auditor to hire an independent auditor and to establish a citizen oversight committee to identify disparities in equal opportunity and access to housing for African Americans in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) The independent auditor shall conduct an audit of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency's compliance with equal opportunity laws, policies, and programs identified in paragraph (c), clause (1). new text end new text begin (c) The state auditor, in collaboration with the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage, shall establish the citizen oversight committee to: new text end new text begin (1) inventory all intersecting state and federal equal opportunity laws, policies, and programs relevant to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (2) oversee the work of the independent auditor; and new text end new text begin (3) report findings and make recommendations to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency. The report with recommendations must be made prior to the start of the 2026 legislative session. new text end